Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-353
Monuments; markers; record of location.

The county board in each county where money is expended under sections 23-351 to 23-355 shall cause to be kept by the county clerk a record of each monument or marker erected, together with a full account of the location or event which said monument or marker shall commemorate, and a duplicate of said record signed by the members of the county board and attested by the signature and seal of the county clerk shall be sent to the Nebraska State Historical Society.

Laws 1927, c. 52, § 3, p. 207;

C.S.1929, § 26-803;

R.S.1943, § 23-353.